Illinois, session 104th, HB5109.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Liquor Control Act of 1934 is amended by 5changing Section 5-3 as follows: 6    (235 ILCS 5/5-3)  (from Ch. 43, par. 118)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-451)8    Sec. 5-3. License fees. Except as otherwise provided 9herein, at the time application is made to the State 10Commission for a license of any class, the applicant shall pay 11to the State Commission the fee hereinafter provided for the 12kind of license applied for.13    The fee for licenses issued by the State Commission shall 14be as follows:15OnlineInitial16renewallicense17 or18 non-online19 renewal20    For a manufacturer's license:21    Class 1. Distiller .................$4,000$5,00022    Class 2. Rectifier .................4,000 5,00023    Class 3. Brewer ....................1,200 1,500  HB5109- 2 -LRB104 19992 RPS 33443 b1    Class 4. First-class Wine 2        Manufacturer ...................7509003    Class 5. Second-class4        Wine Manufacturer ..............1,500 1,7505    Class 6. First-class wine-maker ....750 9006    Class 7. Second-class wine-maker ...1,500 1,7507    Class 8. Limited Wine 8        Manufacturer....................250 350 9    Class 9. Craft Distiller........... 2,000 2,500 10    Class 10. Class 1 Craft Distiller.. 50 75 11    Class 11. Class 2 Craft Distiller.. 75 100 12    Class 12. Class 1 Brewer............50 7513    Class 13. Class 2 Brewer........... 75 100 14    Class 14. Class 3 Brewer........... 25 50 15    For a Brew Pub License..............1,2001,50016    For a Distilling Pub License....... 1,200 1,500 17    For a caterer retailer's license....350 50018    For a foreign importer's license ...25 2519    For an importing distributor's 20        license.........................252521    For a distributor's license 22        (11,250,000 gallons 23        or over).......................1,4502,20024    For a distributor's license 25        (over 4,500,000 gallons, but26        under 11,250,000 gallons)...... 9501,450  HB5109- 3 -LRB104 19992 RPS 33443 b1    For a distributor's license2        (4,500,000 gallons or under)....3004503    For a non-resident dealer's license4        (500,000 gallons or over) 5        or with self-distribution 6        privileges .....................1,200 1,5007    For a non-resident dealer's license8        (under 500,000 gallons) ........250 3509    For a wine-maker's premises 10        license ........................25050011    For a winery shipper's license12        (under 250,000 gallons).........200 35013    For a winery shipper's license 14        (250,000 or over, but 15        under 500,000 gallons)..........7501,00016    For a winery shipper's license 17        (500,000 gallons or over).......1,200 1,50018    For a wine-maker's premises 19        license, second location .......500 1,00020    For a wine-maker's premises 21        license, third location ........5001,00022    For a retailer's license ...........600 75023    For a special event retailer's24        license, (not-for-profit) ......25 2525    For a beer showcase permit, 26        one day only .................. 100 150   HB5109- 4 -LRB104 19992 RPS 33443 b1        2 days or more ................ 150 250 2    For a special use permit license,3        one day only ...................100 1504        2 days or more .................150 2505    For a railroad license .............100 1506    For a boat license .................500 1,0007    For an airplane license, times the8        licensee's maximum number of 9        aircraft in flight, serving 10        liquor over the State at any 11        given time, which either 12        originate, terminate, or make 13        an intermediate stop in 14        the State......................10015015    For a non-beverage user's license:16        Class 1 ........................242417        Class 2 ........................606018        Class 3 ........................12012019        Class 4 ........................24024020        Class 5 ........................60060021    For a broker's license .............750 1,00022    For an auction liquor license ......100 15023    For a homebrewer special 24        event permit....................252525    For a craft distiller 26        tasting permit..................25 25  HB5109- 5 -LRB104 19992 RPS 33443 b1    For a BASSET trainer license....... 300 3502        Tier 1 (1-10 trainers). 750 3        Tier 2 (11-20 trainers). 1,500 4        Tier 3 (21-30 trainers). 3,000 5        Tier 4 (30+ trainers). 6,000 6        Tier 5 (Online course only). 12,000 7        Tier 6 (In-Person and Online). 24,000 8    ILCC Trainer course. 75 9    ILCC BASSET course (online). 10 10    For a tasting representative 11        license........................20030012    For a brewer warehouse permit...... 252513    For a craft distiller 14        warehouse permit................25 25 15    Fees collected under this Section shall be paid into the 16Dram Shop Fund. The State Commission may establish any other 17reasonable fees by administrative rule. The State Commission 18shall waive license renewal fees for those retailers' licenses 19that are designated as "1A" by the State Commission and expire 20on or after July 1, 2022, and on or before June 30, 2023. 21One-half of the funds received for a retailer's license shall 22be paid into the Dram Shop Fund and one-half of the funds 23received for a retailer's license shall be paid into the 24General Revenue Fund.25    No fee shall be paid for licenses issued by the State 26Commission to the following non-beverage users:  HB5109- 6 -LRB104 19992 RPS 33443 b1        (a) Hospitals, sanitariums, or clinics when their use 2    of alcoholic liquor is exclusively medicinal, mechanical, 3    or scientific.4        (b) Universities, colleges of learning, or schools 5    when their use of alcoholic liquor is exclusively 6    medicinal, mechanical, or scientific.7        (c) Laboratories when their use is exclusively for the 8    purpose of scientific research.9(Source: P.A. 102-442, eff. 8-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 10102-699, eff. 4-19-22; 102-1142, eff. 2-17-23; 103-154, eff. 116-30-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 12    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-451)13    Sec. 5-3. License fees. Except as otherwise provided 14herein, at the time application is made to the State 15Commission for a license of any class, the applicant shall pay 16to the State Commission the fee hereinafter provided for the 17kind of license applied for.18    The fee for licenses issued by the State Commission shall 19be as follows:20OnlineInitial21renewallicense22 or23 non-online24 renewal25    For a manufacturer's license:  HB5109- 7 -LRB104 19992 RPS 33443 b1    Class 1. Distiller .................$4,000$5,0002    Class 2. Rectifier .................4,000 5,0003    Class 3. Brewer ....................1,200 1,5004    Class 4. First-class Wine 5        Manufacturer ...................7509006    Class 5. Second-class7        Wine Manufacturer ..............1,500 1,7508    Class 6. First-class wine-maker ....750 9009    Class 7. Second-class wine-maker ...1,500 1,75010    Class 8. Limited Wine 11        Manufacturer....................250 350 12    Class 9. Craft Distiller........... 2,000 2,500 13    Class 10. Class 1 Craft Distiller.. 50 75 14    Class 11. Class 2 Craft Distiller.. 75 100 15    Class 12. Class 1 Brewer............50 7516    Class 13. Class 2 Brewer........... 75 100 17    Class 14. Class 3 Brewer........... 25 50 18    Class 15. Class 3 Craft Distiller.17520019    For a Brew Pub License..............1,2001,50020    For a Distilling Pub License....... 1,200 1,500 21    For a caterer retailer's license....350 50022    For a foreign importer's license ...25 2523    For an importing distributor's 24        license.........................252525    For a distributor's license 26        (11,250,000 gallons HB5109- 8 -LRB104 19992 RPS 33443 b1        or over).......................1,4502,2002    For a distributor's license 3        (over 4,500,000 gallons, but4        under 11,250,000 gallons)...... 9501,4505    For a distributor's license6        (4,500,000 gallons or under)....3004507    For a non-resident dealer's license8        (500,000 gallons or over) 9        or with self-distribution 10        privileges .....................1,200 1,50011    For a non-resident dealer's license12        (under 500,000 gallons) ........250 35013    For a wine-maker's premises 14        license ........................25050015    For a winery shipper's license16        (under 250,000 gallons).........200 35017    For a winery shipper's license 18        (250,000 or over, but 19        under 500,000 gallons)..........7501,00020    For a winery shipper's license 21        (500,000 gallons or over).......1,200 1,50022    For a wine-maker's premises 23        license, second location .......500 1,00024    For a wine-maker's premises 25        license, third location ........5001,00026    For a retailer's license ...........600 750  HB5109- 9 -LRB104 19992 RPS 33443 b1    For a special event retailer's2        license, (not-for-profit) ......25 253    For a beer showcase permit, 4        one day only .................. 100 150 5        2 days or more ................ 150 250 6    For a spirits showcase permit,7        one day only.1001508        2 days or more. 1502509    For a special use permit license,10        one day only ...................100 15011        2 days or more .................150 25012    For a railroad license .............100 15013    For a boat license .................500 1,00014    For an airplane license, times the15        licensee's maximum number of 16        aircraft in flight, serving 17        liquor over the State at any 18        given time, which either 19        originate, terminate, or make 20        an intermediate stop in 21        the State......................10015022    For a non-beverage user's license:23        Class 1 ........................242424        Class 2 ........................606025        Class 3 ........................12012026        Class 4 ........................240240  HB5109- 10 -LRB104 19992 RPS 33443 b1        Class 5 ........................6006002    For a broker's license .............750 1,0003    For an auction liquor license ......100 1504    For a homebrewer special 5        event permit....................25256    For a craft distiller 7        tasting permit..................25 258    For a BASSET trainer license....... 300 3509        Tier 1 (1-10 trainers). 750 10        Tier 2 (11-20 trainers). 1,500 11        Tier 3 (21-30 trainers). 3,000 12        Tier 4 (30+ trainers). 6,000 13        Tier 5 (Online course only). 12,000 14        Tier 6 (In-Person and Online). 24,000 15    ILCC Trainer course. 75 16    ILCC BASSET course (online). 10 17    For a tasting representative 18        license........................20030019    For a brewer warehouse permit...... 252520    For a craft distiller 21        warehouse permit................25 25 22    The State Commission may establish any other reasonable 23fees by administrative rule. Fees collected under this Section 24shall be paid into the Dram Shop Fund. The State Commission 25shall waive license renewal fees for those retailers' licenses 26that are designated as "1A" by the State Commission and expire   HB5109- 11 -LRB104 19992 RPS 33443 b1on or after July 1, 2022, and on or before June 30, 2023. 2One-half of the funds received for a retailer's license shall 3be paid into the Dram Shop Fund and one-half of the funds 4received for a retailer's license shall be paid into the 5General Revenue Fund.6    No fee shall be paid for licenses issued by the State 7Commission to the following non-beverage users:8        (a) Hospitals, sanitariums, or clinics when their use 9    of alcoholic liquor is exclusively medicinal, mechanical, 10    or scientific.11        (b) Universities, colleges of learning, or schools 12    when their use of alcoholic liquor is exclusively 13    medicinal, mechanical, or scientific.14        (c) Laboratories when their use is exclusively for the 15    purpose of scientific research.16(Source: P.A. 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 17104-451, eff. 7-1-26.) 18    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 19changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 20that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 21represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 22not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 23made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 24Public Act.